vendor/org_heigl/hyphenator/src/Org/Heigl/Hyphenator/share/files/dictionaries/hyph_en_GB.dic
.dissatisﬁ4
.dissatisﬁe2
.dissatisﬁ2ed
.dis7sat7is7ﬁ4es.
.eﬃc7a7ci4es.
.eﬃ
.eﬃc
.eﬃc2a1c2i2
.eﬃcacie2
.eﬃc7a7cious.
.eﬃcac2io2
.eﬃcacio4u2
.eﬃc7a7cious4ly.
.eﬃcaciou2sl4
.eﬃcacious2ly
.eﬃc7a7cious7ness.
.eﬃcacious1n2
.eﬃcacious1ne4ss
.eﬃc7a7cious7ness's.
.eﬃcaciousnes8s8'8
.eﬃcaciousness's8
.eﬃc7a2cy.
.eﬃc7acy's.
.eﬃcac8y8'8
.eﬃcacy's8
.eﬄu7en4ce.
.eﬄ2
.eﬄu7en4c4es.
.eﬄu7ence's.
.eﬄuenc8e8'8
.eﬄuence's8
.eﬄu7ent.
.eﬄu7ents.
.eﬄuen4t1s
.eﬄu7ent's.
.eﬄuen8t8'8
.eﬄuent's8
.eﬄu7via.
.eﬄuv2
.eﬄuv2i1a2
.eﬄu7vium.
.eﬄuv2i1u2
.eﬄuvi3um
.eﬄu7vium's.
.eﬄuviu8m8'8
.eﬄuvium's8
.fault-ﬁnd7ers.
.f2au2
.faul4t
.faul8t8-8
.fault-2ﬁn
.fault-ﬁ4nd
.fault-ﬁnde2
.fault-ﬁnder1
.fault-ﬁnde2r3s2
.ﬂuﬃ7e4st.
.ﬂ2
.3ﬂu
.ﬂuﬃ
.ﬂuﬃe2
.ﬂuﬃest2
.hor7riﬁc7al4ly.
.ho4r1r4
.hor3ri
.horr2i1ﬁ
.horriﬁ4c1al
.horriﬁcall2
.horriﬁcal2ly
.horse7ﬂesh.
.ho2r1s2
.hor2se
.horseﬂ2
.horseﬂe2s
.horseﬂes2h
.horse7ﬂesh's.
.horseﬂes8h8'8
.horseﬂesh's8
.horse7ﬂi4es.
.horseﬂie2
.horse7ﬂy.
.horseﬂy
.horse7ﬂy's.
.horseﬂ8y8'8
.horseﬂy's8
.huﬃ7e4st.
.huﬃ
.huﬃe2
.huﬃest2
.iﬃ7e4st.
.iﬃ
.iﬃe2
.iﬃest2
.in7eﬃc7a7ci4es.
.ineﬃ
.ineﬃc
.ineﬃc2a1c2i2
.ineﬃcacie2
.in7eﬃc7a7cious.
.ineﬃcac2io2
.ineﬃcacio4u2
.in7eﬃc7a7cious4ly.
.ineﬃcaciou2sl4
.ineﬃcacious2ly
.in7eﬃc7a7cious7ness.
.ineﬃcacious1n2
.ineﬃcacious1ne4ss
.in7eﬃc7a7cious7ness's.
.ineﬃcaciousnes8s8'8
.ineﬃcaciousness's8
.in7eﬃc7a2cy.
.in7eﬃc7acy's.
.ineﬃcac8y8'8
.ineﬃcacy's8
.in7tens7i7ﬁc7a7tion.
.in1te
.inte4n2s
.inten2si
.intens2i1ﬁ
.intensiﬁc1at
.intensiﬁca1t2io2
.in7tens7i7ﬁc7a7tions.
.inte4n1siﬁcatio4n1s2
.in7tens7i7ﬁc7a7tion's.
.intensiﬁcatio8n8'8
.intensiﬁcation's8
.in7tens7i7ﬁed.
.intensiﬁe2
.intensiﬁ2ed
.in7tens7i7ﬁer.
.intensiﬁ1er1
.in7tens7i7ﬁ7ers.
.intensiﬁe2r1s2
.in7tens7i7ﬁer's.
.intensiﬁe8r8'8
.intensiﬁer's8
.in7tens7i7ﬁ4es.
.mac7cle7s7ﬁeld.
.mac1c4
.maccl2
.macc2le3
.macclesﬁ4
.macclesﬁe2
.macclesﬁel4
.mans7ﬁeld.
.m4a4n2s
.mansﬁ4
.mansﬁe2
.mansﬁel4
.ol7eﬁn.
.ole1ﬁ
.ole2ﬁn
.ol7eﬁn's.
.oleﬁ8n8'8
.oleﬁn's8
.pa7ciﬁc7al4ly.
.p2a1c2i2
.pac2i3ﬁ4
.paciﬁ4c1al
.paciﬁcall2
.paciﬁcal2ly
.par7aﬃn.
.paraﬃ
.par7aﬃns.
.paraﬃ4n1s
.par7aﬃn's.
.paraﬃ8n8'8
.paraﬃn's8
.pathﬁnd7ers.
.p4a2th
.path1ﬁ
.path2ﬁn
.pathﬁ4nd
.pathﬁnde2
.pathﬁnder1
.pathﬁnde2r3s2
.per7si7ﬂa2ge.
.pers4i2ﬂ2
.persiﬂ2a
.per7si7ﬂa2g4es.
.per7si7ﬂage's.
.persiﬂag8e8'8
.persiﬂage's8
.pro7ﬁ7cien7ci4es.
.proﬁ1c2i2
.proﬁcie2
.proﬁc2i1en
.proﬁ1c2i2en1c2i2
.proﬁcie2ncie2
.pro7ﬁ7cien2cy.
.pro7ﬁ7ciency's.
.proﬁcienc8y8'8
.proﬁciency's8
.pro7ﬁ7cient.
.pro7ﬁ7cient4ly.
.proﬁcien2tl
.proﬁcient2ly
.pro7liﬁc7al4ly.
.pro1l
.pro5l2i1ﬁ
.proliﬁ4c1al
.proliﬁcall2
.proliﬁcal2ly
.puﬃ7e4st.
.puﬃ
.puﬃe2
.puﬃest2
.re7aﬃrm.
.rea4
.reaﬃ
.re7aﬃrm7a7tion.
.reaﬃr4m3ati
.reaﬃrma1t2io2
.re7aﬃrm7a7tions.
.reaﬃrmatio4n1s2
.re7aﬃrm7a7tion's.
.reaﬃrmatio8n8'8
.reaﬃrmation's8
.re7aﬃr4med.
.reaﬃrm2e
.reaﬃr2m2ed
.re7aﬃr4m7ing.
.reaﬃrm3i4ng
.re7aﬃrms.
.reaﬃr4m1s
.re7aﬀor7e4st.
.re3a2ﬀ
.reaﬀo
.r2eaﬀ2or2e
.reaﬀorest2
.re7aﬀor7est7a7tion.
.reaﬀorest5at
.reaﬀoresta1t2io2
.ri7bo7ﬂavin.
.r4i3bo2
.riboﬂ2
.riboﬂ2a
.riboﬂ2av
.riboﬂa2v1in
.ri7bo7ﬂavin's.
.riboﬂavi8n8'8
.riboﬂavin's8
.sat7is7ﬁab7il7i4ty.
.s2a1t
.sa2t1is
.satisﬁ4
.satisﬁ1a2
.satisﬁ1ab
.satisﬁab1il
.satisﬁabil1it
.sat7is7ﬁab4le.
.satisﬁa4bl2
.sat7is7ﬁed.
.satisﬁe2
.satisﬁ2ed
.sat7is7ﬁer.
.satisﬁ1er1
.sat7is7ﬁers.
.satisﬁe2r1s2
.sat7is7ﬁer's.
.satisﬁe8r8'8
.satisﬁer's8
.sat7is7ﬁ4es.
.sci7en7tiﬁc7al4ly.
.sc2i1en
.scient2i
.scien1t2i1ﬁ
.scientiﬁ4c1al
.scientiﬁcall2
.scientiﬁcal2ly
.scruﬃ7e4st.
.scr2
.scruﬃ
.scruﬃe2
.scruﬃest2
.self-sat7is7ﬁed.
.5self
.sel8f8-8
.self-s8
.self-s2a1t
.self-sa2t1is
.self-satisﬁ4
.self-satisﬁe2
.self-satisﬁ2ed
.semi7ﬁnal.
.sem2i
.sem2i1ﬁ
.semi2ﬁ4n
.semiﬁn1a
.semiﬁna4l
.semi7ﬁn8al7i4st.
.semiﬁnal1is
.semiﬁnalist2
.semi7ﬁn8al7ists.
.semiﬁnali2s4t3s
.semi7ﬁn8al7ist's.
.semiﬁnalis8t8'8
.semiﬁnalist's8
.semi7ﬁn8als.
.semiﬁna4ls
.semi7ﬁnal's.
.semiﬁna8l8'8
.semiﬁnal's8
.ser7iﬀed.
.ser2i2ﬀ
.seriﬀe
.seriﬀ2ed1
.sher7iﬀ.
.she2
.sh1er1
.sher2i2ﬀ
.sher7iﬀs.
.sheriﬀ3s
.sher7iﬀ's.
.sheriﬀ8'8
.sheriﬀ's8
.spiﬃ7e4st.
.spiﬃ
.spiﬃe2
.spiﬃest2
.stuﬃ7e4st.
.s1tu
.stuﬃ
.stuﬃe2
.st2uﬃest2
.suﬀoc7a4te.
.su2ﬀ
.suﬀo
.suﬀ2oc
.suﬀoc2a
.suﬀoc1at
.suﬀoc7ated.
.suﬀocat4ed
.suﬀoc7a4t4es.
.suﬀoca2t2es
.suﬀoc7at7ing.
.suﬀoca2t3in
.suﬀocat5i4ng
.suﬀoc7at7ing4ly.
.suﬀocatin2gl2
.suﬀocating2ly
.suﬀoc7a7tion.
.suﬀoca1t2io2
.suﬀoc7a7tions.
.suﬀocatio4n1s2
.tar7iﬀ.
.tar1i
.tar2i2ﬀ
.tar7iﬀed.
.tariﬀe
.tariﬀ2ed1
.tar7iﬀs.
.tariﬀ3s
.tar7iﬀ's.
.tariﬀ8'8
.tariﬀ's8
.ter7riﬁc7al4ly.
.3te4r1r4
.ter3ri
.terr2i1ﬁ
.terriﬁ4c1al
.terriﬁcall2
.terriﬁcal2ly
.test7i7ﬁed.
.2t2es
.tes4t2
.te2sti
.tes1t2i1ﬁ
.testiﬁe2
.testiﬁ2ed
.test7i7ﬁer.
.testiﬁ1er1
.test7i7ﬁ7ers.
.testiﬁe2r1s2
.test7i7ﬁer's.
.testiﬁe8r8'8
.testiﬁer's8
.test7i7ﬁ4es.
.trans7ﬁg7ur7a7tion.
.tra4n2s
.transﬁ4
.transﬁg
.transﬁg1u4r
.transﬁgur1a
.transﬁgura1t2io2
.trans7ﬁg7ur7a7tions.
.tra4n1sﬁguratio4n1s2
.trans7ﬁg7ur7a7tion's.
.transﬁguratio8n8'8
.transﬁguration's8
.trans7ﬁg7u4re.
.transﬁgur2e
.trans7ﬁgured.
.transﬁg4u2r4ed
.trans7ﬁg7u2r4es.
.trans7ﬁg7ur7ing.
.transﬁgur1i
.transﬁguri4ng
.trans7ﬁx.
.transﬁx
.trans7ﬁxed.
.transﬁxe4
.transﬁx2e2d
.trans7ﬁx4es.
.trans7ﬁx7ing.
.transﬁx1i
.transﬁxi4ng
.un7sat7is7ﬁed.
.uns2a1t
.unsa2t1is
.unsatisﬁ4
.unsatisﬁe2
.unsatisﬁ2ed
.un7scien7tiﬁc7al4ly.
.uns2c2
.uns1c2i2
.unscie2
.unsc2i1en
.unscient2i
.unscien1t2i1ﬁ
.unscientiﬁ4c1al
.unscientiﬁcall2
.unscientiﬁcal2ly
.view7ﬁnd7ers.
.vie2
.view5ﬁ
.view2ﬁn
.viewﬁ4nd
.viewﬁnde2
.viewﬁnder1
.viewﬁnde2r3s2
.wed7nes7ﬁeld.
.w4ed
.we4d1n2
.wednesﬁ4
.wednesﬁe2
.wednesﬁel4
.white7ﬂy.
.wh2
.whiteﬂ2
.whiteﬂy
.aﬄu7ence’s.
.aﬄuenc8e8’8
.aﬄuence’s8
.aﬀor7est7a7tion’s.
.aﬀorestatio8n8’8
.aﬀorestation’s8
.bakersﬁeld’s.
.bakersﬁel8d8’8
.bakersﬁeld’s8
.bar7ﬂy’s.
.barﬂ8y8’8
.barﬂy’s8
.cal7ci7ﬁc7a7tion’s.
.calciﬁcatio8n8’8
.calciﬁcation’s8
.cross7ﬁre’s.
.crossﬁr8e8’8
.crossﬁre’s8
.cru7ci7ﬁer’s.
.cruciﬁe8r8’8
.cruciﬁer’s8
.cru7ci7ﬁx7ion’s.
.cruciﬁxio8n8’8
.cruciﬁxion’s8
.cru7ci7ﬁx’s.
.cruciﬁ8x8’8
.cruciﬁx’s8
.diﬃd7ence’s.
.diﬃdenc8e8’8
.diﬃdence’s8
.eﬃc7a7cious7ness’s.
.eﬃcaciousnes8s8’8
.eﬃcaciousness’s8
.eﬃc7acy’s.
.eﬃcac8y8’8
.eﬃcacy’s8
.eﬄu7ence’s.
.eﬄuenc8e8’8
.eﬄuence’s8
.eﬄu7ent’s.
.eﬄuen8t8’8
.eﬄuent’s8
.eﬄu7vium’s.
.eﬄuviu8m8’8
.eﬄuvium’s8
.horse7ﬂesh’s.
.horseﬂes8h8’8
.horseﬂesh’s8
.horse7ﬂy’s.
.horseﬂ8y8’8
.horseﬂy’s8
.in7eﬃc7a7cious7ness’s.
.ineﬃcaciousnes8s8’8
.ineﬃcaciousness’s8
.in7eﬃc7acy’s.
.ineﬃcac8y8’8
.ineﬃcacy’s8
.in7tens7i7ﬁc7a7tion’s.
.intensiﬁcatio8n8’8
.intensiﬁcation’s8
.in7tens7i7ﬁer’s.
.intensiﬁe8r8’8
.intensiﬁer’s8
.ol7eﬁn’s.
.oleﬁ8n8’8
.oleﬁn’s8
.par7aﬃn’s.
.paraﬃ8n8’8
.paraﬃn’s8
.per7si7ﬂage’s.
.persiﬂag8e8’8
.persiﬂage’s8
.pro7ﬁ7ciency’s.
.proﬁcienc8y8’8
.proﬁciency’s8
.re7aﬃrm7a7tion’s.
.reaﬃrmatio8n8’8
.reaﬃrmation’s8
.ri7bo7ﬂavin’s.
.riboﬂavi8n8’8
.riboﬂavin’s8
.sat7is7ﬁer’s.
.satisﬁe8r8’8
.satisﬁer’s8
.semi7ﬁnal7ist’s.
.semiﬁnalis8t8’8
.semiﬁnalist’s8
.semi7ﬁnal’s.
.semiﬁna8l8’8
.semiﬁnal’s8
.sher7iﬀ’s.
.sheriﬀ8’8
.sheriﬀ’s8
.tar7iﬀ’s.
.tariﬀ8’8
.tariﬀ’s8
.test7i7ﬁer’s.
.testiﬁe8r8’8
.testiﬁer’s8
.trans7ﬁg7ur7a7tion’s.
.transﬁguratio8n8’8
.transﬁguration’s8
